Hawaii statutes.
§324-2
Identification of persons studied; restriction. The department of health,
or its designee, or any in-hospital staff committee shall use or publish this
material only for the purpose of advancing medical research, medical education,
or education of the public in the interest of reducing morbidity or
mortality. In all events, the identity, or any group of facts which tends
to lead to the identity, of any person whose condition or treatment has been
studied shall be confidential and shall not be revealed under any circumstances.
[L 1963, c 109, §2; Supp, §48B-2; HRS §324-2; am L 1990, c 326, §13(2); am L
2016, c 203, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next